Hawaii statutes.
§261-73 Custody and disposal of derelict
aircraft. (a) An aircraft which has been left unattended for a continuous
period of more than twenty-four hours is a derelict, if:

(1) The aircraft is obstructing a taxiway, runway or
ramp parking area, or is endangering life or property; or

(2) The aircraft has been parked or otherwise left at
a state airport or on public property contrary to law or rules having the force
and effect of law, or the aircraft has been left on private property without
authorization of the owner or occupant of the property and if:

(A) The aircraft's certificate of
registration or aviation document is no longer effective and the registered
owner no longer resides at the address listed in the aircraft registration
document records of the Federal Aviation Administration; or

(B) The last registered owner disclaims
ownership and the current owner's name or address cannot be determined; or

(C) The aircraft identification numbers and
other means of identification have been removed so as to nullify efforts to
locate or identify the owner; or

(D) The aircraft registration records of the
Federal Aviation Administration contain no record that the aircraft has ever
been registered and the owner's name or address cannot be determined.

(b) The director of transportation may cause a
derelict aircraft to be immediately taken into custody. Upon taking custody of
a derelict aircraft the director shall concurrently:

(1) Give public notice of intended disposition;

(2) When possible, post a notice of intended
disposition on the aircraft; and

(3) Serve a duplicate original of the notice of
intended disposition by certified mail, return receipt requested:

(A) On the registered owner of the aircraft
at the last address shown on records in the Federal Aviation Administration;

(B) On all lien holders who have filed a
financing statement indexed in the name of the registered owner in the bureau
of conveyances or who are shown in the records of the Federal Aviation
Administration; and

(C) On any other person known to have an
interest in the aircraft whose address is known to the department of
transportation. If the aircraft is not repossessed within twenty days after
the giving and mailing of the notice, whichever occurs later, the aircraft may be
disposed of by negotiated sale, except that, when two or more purchasers
indicate an interest in purchasing the aircraft, the aircraft will be sold at
public auction to the highest bidder. If no purchaser expresses a desire to
purchase the aircraft, the aircraft may be destroyed or disposed of by any
other method authorized for abandoned aircraft. [L 1981, c 25, pt of §1; am L
1998, c 2, §79]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next